Tennessee, session 114, SB2159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-4-708(d)(7), is amended by
deleting the first sentence and substituting instead:
Beginning in fiscal year 2025-2026, funds in the lottery for education account,
established in § 4-51-111(b), in excess of the sum of the general shortfall reserve
subaccount provided in § 4-51-111(b)(3) and ten million dollars ($10,000,000), must be
transferred to the Tennessee Promise scholarship special reserve account on at least an
annual basis or more frequently as determined by the state treasurer and the
commissioner of finance and administration; provided, that the amount transferred for
each fiscal year must not exceed ten million dollars ($10,000,000).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2159
012251
- 1 -